Idaho, session 2026, S1421.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 57-720, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
57-720. INVESTMENT AUTHORITY -- INVESTMENT POLICIES -- ANNUAL AU-
DIT. (1) The investment board or its investment manager(s) may, and are
hereby authorized to, invest the permanent endowment funds and the earnings
reserve funds of the state of Idaho and other moneys as required by law. The
investment board may, with the approval of the state board of land commis-
sioners, invest other funds that are exempt from section 67-1210, Idaho
Code, provided however, that the costs of investment of such funds may be
deducted by the investment board from investment proceeds.
(2) The funds invested by the investment board may be combined or pooled
for investment.
(3) Earnings reserve funds shall be accounted for separately from per-
manent endowment funds.
(4) Prior to the annual calculation of gains and losses pursuant to sec-
tion 57-724, Idaho Code, the investment board shall allocate the end of fis-
cal year market value between the permanent endowment funds and the earnings
reserve funds. This allocation shall be made based upon the proportion that
the market value of the permanent endowment funds and the market value of
the earnings reserve funds bear to the combined market value of both sets of
funds, at the end of the fiscal year.
(5)(a) Investments may include physical gold and silver. Except as
provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, physical gold and silver,
owned directly and held under this subsection, shall be maintained se-
curely in a depository for precious metals constructed, at a minimum,
to currently accepted industry standards for secure storage and located
within the geographical boundaries of this state, a state contiguous to
this state, or the state of Texas. The Idaho department of finance shall
ensure that the gold and silver held in a qualifying depository under
this subsection is insured, independently audited, and physically seg-
regated from other assets.


(b) Physical gold and silver, owned directly and held under this sub-
section, may be stored by a bank chartered under the Idaho bank act or a
credit union organized under the Idaho credit union act when such facil-
ity is located within the geographical boundaries of this state and the
gold and silver is stored in a class 1 vault.
(c) The maximum allowed investment in physical gold and silver shall
not exceed seven and one-half percent (7.5%) of the moneys invested pur-
suant to this section.
(5) (6) The investment board shall formulate investment policies gov-
erning the investment of permanent endowment funds and earnings reserve
funds and the investment of other funds accepted for investment by the in-
vestment board pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. The policies
shall pertain to the types, kinds or nature of investment of any of the funds,
and any limitations, conditions or restrictions upon the methods, practices
or procedures for investment, reinvestments, purchases, sales or exchange
transactions, provided such policies shall not conflict with nor be in dero-
gation of any Idaho constitutional provision or of the provisions of this
chapter.
(6) (7) Annually, the investment board shall cause an audit to be con-
ducted of the investment of permanent endowment funds and earnings reserve
funds, such audit to be conducted by a recognized certified public accoun-
tant. The certified public accountant conducting the audit shall not be an
employee of the state. The expense of such audit shall be paid from earnings
reserve funds.
(7) (8) The state treasurer shall invest the income funds of the respec-
tive endowment funds and distribute the moneys in the income funds according
to legislative appropriation.
SECTION 2. That Section 59-1312, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
59-1312. SELECTION OF FUNDING AGENT(S) -- INVESTMENT OF ASSETS -- TAX
EXEMPTION. (1) The board shall select the funding agent(s) and establish a
medium for funding, which may be a self-administration pension trust fund or
a group annuity contract, or combination thereof. The contract shall autho-
rize the funding agent(s) to hold and, subject to the provisions of subsec-
tions (2) and (3) of this section, to invest moneys for the system and to pro-
vide the retirement benefits and death benefits for retired members granted
by this chapter.
(2) The board is authorized to select investment managers registered
with the Securities and Exchange Commission to invest, reinvest and other-
wise manage, subject to the restrictions outlined in subsection (3) (4) of
this section, such portions of the assets of the fund as are assigned by the
board and are held by a funding agent(s) designated by the board.
(3)(a) Investments may include physical gold and silver. Except as
provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, physical gold and silver,
owned directly and held under this subsection, shall be maintained se-
curely in a depository for precious metals constructed, at a minimum,
to currently accepted industry standards for secure storage and located
within the geographical boundaries of this state, a state contiguous to
this state, or the state of Texas. The Idaho department of finance shall


ensure that the gold and silver held in a qualifying depository under
this subsection is insured, independently audited, and physically seg-
regated from other assets.
(b) Physical gold and silver, owned directly and held under this sub-
section, may be stored by a bank chartered under the Idaho bank act or a
credit union organized under the Idaho credit union act when such facil-
ity is located within the geographical boundaries of this state and the
gold and silver is stored in a class 1 vault.
(c) The maximum allowed investment in physical gold and silver shall
not exceed seven and one-half percent (7.5%) of the moneys invested pur-
suant to this section.
(3) (4) The funding agent(s) and investment managers, in acquiring, in-
vesting, reinvesting, exchanging, retaining, selling and managing the mon-
eys and properties of the system, shall be governed by the Uniform Prudent
Investor Act, chapter 5, title 68, Idaho Code; provided, however, that the
board is hereby authorized and empowered, in its sole discretion, to limit,
control and designate the types, kinds and amounts of such investments. The
funding agent(s) will not be required to segregate moneys applicable to in-
dividual employees or employers, but shall only be responsible for the ag-
gregate of such moneys as are received by it.
(4) (5) All contributions paid to the funding agent(s) shall be con-
strued as being exempt from premium taxes payable pursuant to section
41-402, Idaho Code.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.